New York, session 2025-2026, A4982.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1-a of section 404 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 105 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 1-a. The commissioner may issue special number plates to applicants 5 who are members of veterans organizations in the same manner as other 6 number plates are issued pursuant to this article. Such special number 7 plates shall be issued [only] upon [(a)] payment of [a one-time service 8 charge of ten dollars in addition to] the regular registration fee 9 prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, and [(b)] 10 submission of proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the appli- 11 cant is presently a member of the veterans organization for which such 12 plate is requested. Such membership shall be verified annually by the 13 applicant. Application for such plates shall be made in accordance with 14 regulations promulgated by the commissioner with respect to the issuance 15 of such plates. Provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall 16 be deemed to supersede the provisions of section four hundred four-d, 17 four hundred four-e, four hundred four-h, four hundred four-i, four 18 hundred four-j, four hundred four-k, four hundred four-p, four hundred 19 four-aa, or four hundred four-dd of this article. 20 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 404-h of the vehicle and traffic law, as 21 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 24 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01829-01-5 A. 4982 2 1 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 2 [provided, however, that an additional one-time service charge of ten 3 dollars shall be charged for such plate]. 4 § 3. Subdivision 4 of section 404-j of the vehicle and traffic law, as 5 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 4. Fee. A special plate and registration issued pursuant to this 8 section shall be issued upon payment of the regular registration fee 9 prescribed by section four hundred one of this article [provided, howev- 10 er, that an additional one-time service charge of ten dollars shall be 11 charged for such plate]. 12 § 4. Subdivision 3 of section 404-v of the vehicle and traffic law, as 13 amended by chapter 490 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 16 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 17 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this arti- 18 cle[, provided, however, that an additional one-time service charge of 19 ten dollars shall be charged for such plate. Provided, however, that one 20 year after the effective date of this section funds in the amount of 21 five thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be available, shall be 22 allocated from such funds to the department to offset costs associated 23 with the production of such license plates]. 24 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 404-w of the vehicle and traffic law, as 25 added by chapter 105 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 26 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 27 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 28 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this arti- 29 cle[, provided, however, that an additional one-time service charge of 30 ten dollars shall be charged for such plate]. 31 § 6. Subdivision 4 of section 404-w of the vehicle and traffic law, as 32 added by chapter 493 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 33 4. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 34 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 35 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 36 [provided, however, that an additional one time service charge of ten 37 dollars shall be charged for such plate]. 38 § 7. Subdivision 3 of section 404-aa of the vehicle and traffic law, 39 as added by chapter 103 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as 40 follows: 41 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 42 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 43 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this arti- 44 cle[; provided, however, that an additional one-time service charge of 45 ten dollars shall be charged for such plate]. 46 § 8. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 47 the date on which it shall have become a law.